Utah statutes.
53A-11-1204.   Curricular clubs -- Authorization.

(1)  Faculty members or students proposing a curricular club shall submit written application for authorization on a form approved by the school governing board.

(2)  A school governing board may exempt a club whose membership is determined by student body election or a club that is governed by an association that regulates interscholastic activities from the authorization requirements under this section.

(3)  An application for authorization of a curricular club shall include:

(a)  the recommended club name;

(b)  a statement of the club's purpose, goals, and activities;

(c)  a statement of the club's categorization, which shall be included in the parental consent required under Section 53A-11-1210, indicating all of the following that may apply:

(i)  athletic;

(ii)  business/economic;

(iii)  agriculture;

(iv)  art/music/performance;

(v)  science;

(vi)  gaming;

(vii)  religious;

(viii)  community service/social justice; and

(ix)  other;

(d)  the recommended meeting times, dates, and places;

(e)  a statement that the club will comply with the provisions of this part and all other applicable laws, rules, or policies; and

(f)  a budget showing the amount and source of any funding provided or to be provided to the club and its proposed use.

(4)  The application may be as brief as a single page so long as it contains the items required under this section.

(5)  A school shall approve the name of a curricular club consistent with the club's purposes and its school sponsorship.

(6) (a)  A school shall determine curriculum relatedness by strictly applying this part's definition of curricular club to the club application.

(b)  If the school finds that the proposed club is a curricular club, the school shall continue to review the application as an application for authorization of a curricular club.

(c)  If the school finds that the proposed club is a noncurricular club, the school may:

(i)  return the application to the faculty member or students proposing the club for amendment; or

(ii)  review the application as an application for authorization of a noncurricular club.

(7) (a)  Only curricular clubs may be authorized for elementary schools.

(b)  A school governing body may limit, or permit a secondary school to limit, the authorization of clubs at the secondary school to only curricular clubs.



Enacted by Chapter 114, 2007 General Session

